Washington statutes.
RCW 24.24.050

Bylaws.

Every such corporation shall have full power and authority to provide by its bylaws for the manner in which such certificates of participation of its certificates or shares of stock shall be held and represented, and may also in like manner provide, that its shares of stock shall not be transferred to, or be held or owned by any person, or by any corporation other than a chartered body of the order or society represented in its membership.

[ 1927 c 190 s 5; RRS s 3887-5.]